Wisconsin, session 2025, SB790.
do enact as follows:SB790,14Section 1. 799.01 (1) (cr) of the statutes is amended to read:SB790,2,31799.01 (1) (cr) Third-party complaints, personal injury claims, and tort 2claims. Third-party complaints, personal injury claims, and actions based in tort, 3where the amount claimed is $5,000 $10,000 or less.SB790,24Section 2. Initial applicability.SB790,2,65(1) This act first applies to actions commenced on the effective date of this 6subsection.SB790,2,77